Utah statutes.
58-71-501.   Unlawful conduct.

(1)  "Unlawful conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501:

(a)  buying, selling, or fraudulently obtaining, any medical diploma, license, certificate, or registration related to credentials of a naturopathic physician; and

(b)  aiding or abetting the buying, selling, or fraudulently obtaining of any naturopathic physician diploma, license, certificate, or registration.

(2)  "Unlawful conduct" does not include the good faith expression of informed opinions as to available alternatives to the treatment prescribed or advised by the licensee.



Enacted by Chapter 282, 1996 General Session

